src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/N-vuorru_gt-dict.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


Tests:

  Noun - vuorru: # både med og utan G3
    vuorru+N+Sg+Nom: []
    vuorru+N+Sg+Loc: []
    vuorru+N+G3+Sg+Nom: vuorru
    vuorru+N+G3+Sg+Gen: vuorru
    vuorru+N+G3+Sg+Acc: vuorru
    vuorru+N+G3+Sg+Loc: vuorrus
